Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7421.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 45-13-9 of the General Laws in Chapter 45-13 entitled "State Aid" is
hereby amended to read as follows:
45-13-9. Reimbursement to cities and towns and school districts for the costs of state
mandates.
(a)(1) The department of revenue shall submit to the budget office by October 1 of each
year, a report by each city and town, of the cost of state mandates established after January 1, 1979,
to be reimbursed for the next preceding July 1 — June 30 period.
(2) The budget office shall annually include the statewide total of the statement of costs of
state mandates eligible to be reimbursed in the state budget for the next fiscal year for consideration
by the governor in preparing a final budget proposal for submission to the general assembly in
accordance with § 35-3-7 of the General Laws; provided, that any costs resulting from the rules
and regulations of state departments or agencies shall be allocated to the budgets of those
departments or agencies.
(b) The state treasurer shall in July of each year distribute to cities and towns the
reimbursements for state mandated costs as may shall be appropriated by the general assembly.
(c) The department of revenue shall publish a report, in collaboration with local education
agencies (LEAs), identifying costs borne by school districts that are partially funded or unfunded.
The report shall be provided to the general assembly, offices of the speaker of the house, the senate
president, and the governor, for consideration when preparing the final budget proposal to be

submitted to the general assembly. The report shall be accessible to the public and published on the
state transparency portal.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003604
========
LC003604 - Page 2 of 3